resources/ru_RU.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY оаитенрсвйлпкьыяудмзшбчгщюжцёхфэъАВСМКГПТЕИЛФНДОЭРЗЮЯБХЖШЦУЧЬЫЪЩЙЁ

FLAG long

SFX II Y 61
SFX II а и [гкхжчшщ]а (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п. и мн.ч.и.п.+в.п.)
SFX II а ы [^гкхжчшщ]а (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п. и мн.ч.и.п.+в.п.)
SFX II а е а (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.+п.п.)
SFX II а у а (NOUN.ед.ч.в.п.)
SFX II а ам а (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX II а ами а (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX II а ах а (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX II я и я (NOUN.ед.ч.ж.р.р.п.+д.п.(слова на -ия) и мн.ч.и.п.+в.п.)
SFX II я е [^и]я (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.+п.п.)
SFX II я ю я (NOUN.ед.ч.в.п.)
SFX II я ей я (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX II я ею я (NOUN.ед.ч.т2.п.)
SFX II я ям я (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX II я ями я (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX II я ях я (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX II о а о (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX II о у о (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX II о ом о (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX II о е о (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX II о ам о (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX II о ами о (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX II о ах о (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX II е а [жчшщц]е (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX II е я [^жчшщц]е (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX II е у [жчшщц]е (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX II е ю [^жчшщц]е (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX II е ем е (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX II е и ие (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX II е и бытье (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX II е и алованье (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX II е ам [жчшщц]е (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX II е ям [^жчшщц]е (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX II е ами [жчшщц]е (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX II е ями [^жчшщц]е (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX II е ах [жчшщц]е (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX II е ях [^жчшщц]е (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX II й я й (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX II й ю й (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX II й ем й (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX II й и [и]й (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п. и мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX II й е [^и]й (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX II й е кий (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX II й ев й (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX II й ям й (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX II й ями й (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX II й ях й (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.) 
SFX II ь я ь (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX II ь ю ь (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX II ь ем ь (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX II ь е ь (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX II ь ей ь (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX II ь ям ь (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX II ь ями ь (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX II ь ьми зверь (NOUN.мн.ч.т2.п.)
SFX II ь ях ь (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX II 0 а [^аеиоуыэюяйь] (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX II 0 у [^аеиоуыэюяйь] (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX II 0 е [^аеиоуыэюяйь] (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX II 0 ам [^аеиоуыэюяйь] (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX II 0 ами [^аеиоуыэюяйь] (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX II 0 ах [^аеиоуыэюяйь] (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX II 0 0 солдат (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)


SFX IH Y 38
SFX IH а и [гкхжчшщ]а (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п. и мн.ч.и.п.+в.п.)
SFX IH а ы [^гкхжчшщ]а (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п. и мн.ч.и.п.+в.п.)
SFX IH а е а (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.+п.п.)
SFX IH а у а (NOUN.ед.ч.в.п.)
SFX IH я и я (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.+д.п.(слова на -ия) и мн.ч.и.п.+в.п.)
SFX IH я е [^и]я (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.+п.п.)
SFX IH я ю я (NOUN.ед.ч.в.п.)
SFX IH я ей я (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX IH я ею я (NOUN.ед.ч.т2.п.)
SFX IH и ам и (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX IH и ами и (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX IH и ах и (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX IH ы ам ы (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX IH ы ами ы (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX IH ы ах ы (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX IH о а о (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX IH о у о (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX IH о ом о (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX IH о е о (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX IH е а [жчшщц]е (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX IH е я [^жчшщц]е (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX IH е у [жчшщц]е (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX IH е ю [^жчшщц]е (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX IH е ем е (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX IH е и ие (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX IH е и забытье (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX IH й я й (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX IH й ю й (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX IH й ем й (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX IH й и [и]й (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX IH й е [^и]й (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX IH ь я ь (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX IH ь ю ь (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX IH ь ем ь (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX IH ь е ь (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX IH 0 а [^аеиоуыэюяйь] (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX IH 0 у [^аеиоуыэюяйь] (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX IH 0 е [^аеиоуыэюяйь] (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)

SFX Ii Y 21
SFX Ii а ам а (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX Ii а ами а (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ii а ах а (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX Ii и ям и (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX Ii и ями [^тд]и (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ii и ями [^ю]ди (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ii и ями [^е]ти (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ii и ями нети (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ii и ьми дети (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ii и ьми люди (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ii и ях и (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX Ii я ям я (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX Ii я ями я (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ii я ях я (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX Ii о и [гкхжшчщ]о (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX Ii о ы [^гкхжшчщ]о (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX Ii е и [щ]е (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX Ii й и й (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX Ii ь и ь (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX Ii 0 и [ГгКкхжчшщ] (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX Ii 0 ы [^аеиоуыэюяйьГгКкхжчшщ] (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)

SFX Ih Y 11
SFX Ih а ой а (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ih а ою а (NOUN.ед.ч.т2.п.)
SFX Ih ня ен [^йь]ня (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ih ьня ен ьня (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ih йня ен йня (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ih я ев [^н]я (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ih ни ен [^йь]ни (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ih и ь зори (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ih ки ек ки (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ih ье ей ье (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ih 0 ом [^аеиоуыэюяйь] (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)

SFX Iq Y 8
SFX Iq а ей [жчшщц]а (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX Iq а ею [жчшщц]а (NOUN.ед.ч.т2.п.)
SFX Iq а ью тысяча (NOUN.ед.ч.т3.п.)
SFX Iq 0 ем [жчшщц] (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX Iq я ей я (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iq и ей и (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iq е ей е (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iq ло ел ло (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)

SFX Iw Y 31
SFX Iw а 0 [бвгджзлмпрстфхчшщ]а (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw и 0 [бвгджзлмпрстфхчшщ]и (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ы 0 [бвгджзлмпрстфхчшщ]ы (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw о 0 [бвгджзлмпрстфхчшщ]о (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw е 0 [бвгджзлмпрстфхцчшщ]е (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw а 0 [аеиоуыэюякм]ка (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw и 0 [аеиоуыэюя]ки (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ка ок [ш]ка (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw о 0 [аеиоуыэюякмс]ко (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw а 0 [^хжчшбвпф]на (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ы 0 [^хжчшбвпф]ны (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ны ен [жчшщ]ны (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw о 0 [^хжчшбвпф]но (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw а 0 [аеиоуыэюяжшщцчйн]ца (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ы 0 [аеиоуыэюяжшщцчйн]цы (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw о 0 [аеиоуыэюяжшщцчйн]цо (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw я й [аеиоуыэюя]я (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw я ь [^аеиоуыэюяьй]я (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ья ий ья (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw йя ий йя (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ье ий ье (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw и й [аеиоуыэюя]и (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw е й [аеиоуыэюя]е (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw 0 ей [жчшщ] (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ок ек [жчшщ]ок (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ец цем [^аеиоуыэюял]ец (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX Iw ец цев [^аеиоуыэюял]ец (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ец йцем [аеиоуыэюя]ец (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX Iw ец йцев [аеиоуыэюя]ец (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Iw ец ьцем [л]ец (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX Iw ец ьцев [л]ец (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)

SFX Ie Y 62
SFX Ie ьба еб ьба (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie га ог [зл]га (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie га ог кабарга (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie га ег кочерга (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie йга ег йга (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ьга ег ьга (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ка ок [^жчшщцйьаеиоуыэюя]ка (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ки ок [^жчшщцйьаеиоуыэюя]ки (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ко ок [^жчшщцйьаеиоуыэюя]ко (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ка ек [жчшщц]ка (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ки ек [жчшщц]ки (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ко ек [жчшщц]ко (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie йка ек йка (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie йки ек йки (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie йко ек йко (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ька ек ька (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ьки ек ьки (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ла ел етла (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie лы ел козлы (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ла ол кукла (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ло ол ло (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ма ем [чш]ма (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie йма ем йма (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ьма ем ьма (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ьмо ем ьмо (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie на он [хжчш]на (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie на ен [бпвфмс]на (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ны ен [бпвфмс]ны (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie но он [гкх]но (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie но ен [^гкх]но (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ра ер сестра (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ро ер ро (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ца ец [^аеиоуыэюяйь]ца (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie цы ец [^аеиоуыэюяйь]цы (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie цо ец [^аеиоуыэюяйь]цо (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie це ец [^аеиоуыэюяйь]це (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie йца ец йца (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie йцы ец йцы (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie йцо ец айцо (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie йцо иц яйцо (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ьца ец ьца (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ьцы ец ьцы (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ьцо ец ьцо (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ьце ец ьце (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie а ей [жчшщ]а (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie я ев вайшья (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie я ев кшатрия (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie я ев пария (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ья ей ья (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie йя й йя (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ля ель ля (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ли ель ли (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ня ень [^х]ня (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ня онь хня (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ок ков ок (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ек ков ек (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ец цом [^аеиоуыэюял]ец (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ie ец цов [^аеиоуыэюял]ец (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ец йцом [аеиоуыэюя]ец (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ie ец йцов [аеиоуыэюя]ец (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX Ie ец ьцом [л]ец (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX Ie ец ьцов [л]ец (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)

SFX IF Y 57
SFX IF ь и ь (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.+д.п.+п.п. и мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF 0 ю ь (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF ь ей ь (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX IF ь ам [жчшщ]ь (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX IF ь ям [^жчшщ]ь (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX IF ь ами [жчшщ]ь (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF ь ями [^жчшщ]ь (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF ь ьми дверь (NOUN.мн.ч.т2.п.)
SFX IF ь ьми лошадь (NOUN.мн.ч.т2.п.)
SFX IF ь ьми плеть (NOUN.мн.ч.т2.п.)
SFX IF ь ьми кость (NOUN.мн.ч.т2.п.)
SFX IF ь ах [жчшщ]ь (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX IF ь ях [^жчшщ]ь (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX IF ок ка нок (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX IF ок ку нок (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX IF ок ком нок (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF ок ке нок (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX IF енок ята енок (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF онок ата онок (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF енок ят енок (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX IF онок ат онок (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX IF енок ятам енок (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX IF онок атам онок (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX IF енок ятами енок (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF онок атами онок (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF енок ятах енок (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX IF онок атах онок (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX IF ек ка очек (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX IF ек ку очек (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX IF ек ком очек (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF ек ке очек (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX IF еночек ятки еночек (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF оночек атки оночек (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF еночек яток еночек (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF оночек аток оночек (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF еночек яткам еночек (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF оночек аткам оночек (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF еночек ятками еночек (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF оночек атками оночек (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF еночек ятках еночек (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF оночек атках оночек (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF ей ья ей (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.)
SFX IF ей ью ей (NOUN.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX IF ей ьем ей (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF ей ье ей (NOUN.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX IF ей ьи ей (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF ей ьев ей (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX IF ей ьям ей (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX IF ей ьями ей (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF ей ьях ей (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
SFX IF я ени я (NOUN.ед.ч.р.п.+д.п.+п.п.)
SFX IF я енем я (NOUN.ед.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF я ена я (NOUN.мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX IF я ен я (NOUN.мн.ч.р.п.)
SFX IF я енам я (NOUN.мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX IF я енами я (NOUN.мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX IF я енах я (NOUN.мн.ч.п.п.)
